Washington statutes.
RCW 39.52.020

Limitations on issuance of bonds.

No bonds issued under this chapter shall be issued for a longer period than twenty years. Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to authorize the issuing of any funding bonds which exceeds any constitutional or statutory limitations of indebtedness. Such bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapters 39.46 and 39.53 RCW, exclusive of RCW 39.53.120.

[ 1995 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 7; 1984 c 186 s 37; 1983 c 167 s 113; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 60; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 31; 1895 c 170 s 2; RRS s 5619.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: "Because market conditions are such that the state, state agencies, state colleges and universities, and the political subdivisions, municipal corporations and quasi municipal corporations of this state are finding it increasingly difficult and, in some cases, impossible to market bond issues and all other obligations, at the maximum permissible rate of interest payable on such bonds and obligations, it is the purpose of this 1970 amendatory act to remove all maximum rates of interest payable on such bonds and obligations." [ 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 1.]

Validation—Saving—1969 ex.s. c 232: "All bonds, the issuance of which was authorized or ratified at a general or special election held within the issuing jurisdiction prior to the effective date of this amendatory act or the proposition for the issuance of which will be submitted at such an election pursuant to action of the legislative authority of the issuer taken prior to the effective date of this amendatory act, may be sold and issued with an interest rate or rates greater than any interest rate restriction contained in the ballot proposition or ordinance or resolution relating to such authorization or ratification if such bonds are sold and issued with an interest rate or rates not greater than those permitted by the applicable provision of this amendatory act." [ 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 94.]

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: "If a court of competent jurisdiction shall adjudge to be invalid or unconstitutional any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this 1969 amendatory act, such judgment or decree shall not affect, impair or nullify the remainder of this act, but the effect thereof shall be confined to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this act so adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional." [ 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 95.]

Bonds, form, terms of sale, payment, etc.: Chapter 39.44 RCW.